bg-BG: Маркировки за измерване на нивото на маслото върху щеката: Защрихован диапазон; Пълно/Доливане; Градуиран обем (qt/L); Топло/Студено; Само мин./макс.; Без маркировки; Друго
nb: Målemarkeringer for oljepeilepinne: Skravert område; Full/Fyll på; Skalert volum (qt/L); Varm/Kald; Kun min/maks; Ingen markeringer; Annet
en: Oil dipstick measurement markings: Crosshatch range; Full/Add; Graduated volume (qt/L); Hot/Cold; Min/Max only; No markings; Other
sl-SI: Merilne oznake na merilni palici za olje: Šrafirano območje; Polno/Dodaj; Stopnjevana prostornina (qt/l); Vroče/Hladno; Samo min/maks; Brez oznak; Drugo
nl: Oliepeilstok meetmarkeringen: Arceringbereik; Vol/Toevoegen; Maataanduiding volume (qt/L); Warm/Koud; Alleen Min/Max; Geen markeringen; Overig
vi: Vạch chia mức dầu trên que thăm dầu: Phạm vi gạch chéo; Đầy/Thêm; Thể tích được chia vạch (qt/L); Nóng/Lạnh; Chỉ Tối thiểu/Tối đa; Không có vạch đánh dấu; Khác
es: Marcas de medición de la varilla de aceite: Rango de cuadrícula; Lleno/agregar; Volumen graduado (qt/L); Caliente/frío; Solo mín/máx; Sin marcas; Otro
sv: Mätmarkeringar på oljesticka: Rutmönster; Full/fyll på; Graderad volym (qt/l); Varm/kall; Endast Min/Max; Inga markeringar; Övrigt
pt-BR: Vareta de óleo marcações de medição: Faixa hachurada; Cheio/Adicionar; Volume graduado (qt/L); Quente/Frio; Apenas Mín/Máx; Sem marcações; Outro
hr-HR: Oznake za mjerenje ulja na mjernoj šipki: Raspon šrafure; Pun/Dodaj; Stupnjevani volumen (qt/l); Vruće/Hladno; Samo min/maks; Bez oznaka; Ostalo
cs: Značky na měrce oleje: Šrafovaná oblast; Plno/Přidat; Objemová stupnice (qt/l); Teplý/Studený; Pouze Min/Max; Bez značení; Ostatní
fr: Repères de niveau de la jauge d’huile: Zone hachurée; Plein/Ajouter; Volume gradué (qt/L); Chaud/Froid; Min/Max uniquement; Aucune marque; Autre
el: Σημάδια μέτρησης στη ράβδο μέτρησης λαδιού: Περιοχή με διαγράμμιση; Γεμάτο/Προσθήκη; Διαβαθμισμένος όγκος (qt/L); Ζεστό/Κρύο; Μόνο Ελάχιστο/Μέγιστο; Χωρίς ενδείξεις; Άλλο
ru: Измерительные метки масляного щупа: Штриховка; Полный / Долить; Шкала объема (кварты/литры); Горячий / Холодный; Только Мин / Макс; Без отметок; Другое
it: Tacche di misurazione dell'astina di livello dell'olio: Zona zigrinata; Pieno/Aggiungere; Volume graduato (qt/L); Caldo/Freddo; Solo Min/Max; Nessuna marcatura; Altro
ro-RO: Marcajele de măsurare a jojei de ulei: Zonă hașurată; Plin/Adaugă; Volum gradat (qt/L); Cald/Rece; Doar Min/Max; Fără marcaje; Altele
lt-LT: Alyvos matuoklio žymėjimai: Tinklelio diapazonas; Pilna / Papildyti; Graduotas tūris (qt/l); Karšta / Šalta; Tik min. / maks.; Be žymėjimų; Kita
th: เครื่องหมายวัดระดับบนก้านวัดน้ำมันเครื่อง: ระยะรอยขีดไขว้; เต็ม/เติม; ปริมาตรบอกระดับ (ควอร์ต/ลิตร); ร้อน/เย็น; ต่ำสุด/สูงสุดเท่านั้น; ไม่มีเครื่องหมาย; อื่นๆ
de: Messmarkierungen des Ölmessstabs: Schraffierter Bereich; Full/Add; Skaliertes Volumen (qt/L); Heiß/Kalt; Nur Min/Max; Keine Markierungen; Andere
ja: オイルレベルゲージの目盛り: クロスハッチ範囲; フル/追加; 目盛り付き容量 (qt/L); ホット/コールド; 最小/最大のみ; 目盛りなし; その他
ko: 오일 딥스틱의 측정 눈금: 크로스해치 범위; 최대/보충; 눈금 부피(qt/L); 고온/저온; 최소/최대만; 표시 없음; 기타
fi: Öljynmittatikun mittausmerkinnät: Ristikkokuvioalue; Full/Add; Porrastettu tilavuus (qt/l); Kuuma/Kylmä; Vain min/max; Ei merkintöjä; Muu
tr: Yağ seviye çubuğu ölçüm işaretleri: Çapraz taralı aralık; Dolu/Ekle; Dereceli hacim (qt/L); Sıcak/Soğuk; Sadece Min/Maks; İşaret yok; Diğer
pl: Oznaczenia pomiarowe bagnetu oleju: Zakreskowy (kratka); Pełny/Dolej; Skala pojemności (qt/l); Gorący/Zimny; Tylko Min/Max; Brak oznaczeń; Inne
da: Markeringer på oliepind: Skraveret område; Fuld/tilføj; Gradueret volumen (qt/L); Varm/kold; Kun min./maks.; Ingen markeringer; Andet
zh-TW: 機油尺測量刻度: 網格範圍; 滿/添加; 刻度容量 (夸脫/公升); 熱/冷; 僅最低/最高; 無標記; 其他
pt-PT: marcações de medição da vareta do óleo: Faixa com hachura; Cheio/Adicionar; Volume graduado (qt/l); Quente/Frio; Apenas mín/máx; Sem marcas; Outro
zh-CN: 机油尺测量刻度标记: 交叉网纹范围; 满/添加; 刻度容积 (qt/L); 热/冷; 仅 Min/Max; 无标记; 其他
hu: Olajnívópálca mérési jelölései: Vonalkázott tartomány; Tele / Utántöltés; Skálázott űrtartalom (qt/l); Meleg / Hideg; Csak Min / Max; Nincs jelölés; Egyéb
sk-SK: Meracie značky na mierke oleja: Rozsah so šrafovaním; Plné/Pridať; Odmerný objem (qt/l); Teplý/studený; Iba min/max; Bez značiek; Iné